Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.543

Grants for undergraduate coursework for recipients of the Washington scholars award.

Students named by the office of student financial assistance after June 30, 1994, as recipients of the Washington scholars award under RCW 28A.600.100 through 28A.600.150 shall be eligible to receive a grant for undergraduate coursework as authorized under RCW 28B.76.660.

[ 2015 c 55 s 219; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 152; 2004 c 275 s 49; 1995 1st sp.s. c 5 s 2; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 19; 1992 c 231 s 17; 1990 c 33 s 558; 1987 c 465 s 2. Prior: 1985 c 390 s 30; 1985 c 370 s 68; 1985 c 341 s 16; 1984 c 278 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Severability—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 5: See notes following RCW 28A.600.130.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Application—1987 c 465 s 2: "The amendments to RCW 28B.15.543 by section 2, chapter 465, Laws of 1987 shall apply to persons holding the Washington scholars award as of July 26, 1987, as well as persons holding the award after July 26, 1987." [ 1987 c 465 s 3.]

Severability—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.185.010.